New York, session 2025-2026, A3934.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 71-b 2 to read as follows: 3 § 71-b. Reintegration pilot program. 1. The department, in collab- 4 oration with the office of temporary and disability assistance, the 5 office of mental health and the office of addiction services and 6 supports shall establish and conduct a five-year reintegration pilot 7 program to help ensure that incarcerated individuals within correctional 8 facilities receive the supports and services necessary to meaningfully 9 prepare for their release while still incarcerated, to assist individ- 10 uals to reintegrate into the community upon release, and to reduce reci- 11 divism. Such pilot program shall be conducted in three correctional 12 facilities, consisting of one female and two male facilities, selected 13 by the department, taking into consideration adequate geographic 14 distribution within the state as well as availability of sufficient 15 links to supports and services required by this section. For purposes 16 of this pilot program, there shall be at least one hundred incarcerated 17 individuals who on a voluntary basis request placement in the pilot 18 program up to one year before their earliest expected release date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05018-02-6 A. 3934--A 2 1 Each incarcerated individual shall receive an in-depth screening and 2 assessment to determine their specific needs as relating to, including 3 but not limited to, mental health and substance use disorder services, 4 educational needs and job readiness. In addition to an in-depth screen- 5 ing and assessment, participants in the pilot program shall also be 6 linked with not-for-profit organizations and peer to peer engagement 7 opportunities to assist with the individual's reintegration planning. 8 This shall occur no less than six months prior to their expected release 9 date and shall consist of, but not be limited to, assistance applying 10 for public benefits, referrals and links to mental health and/or 11 substance use disorder service providers if applicable, connections to 12 employment opportunities as well as job training programs if appropri- 13 ate, assistance finding available stable housing options to be available 14 upon release and general supports and services that may be helpful for 15 an individual reintegrating back into the community. 16 2. Prior to release from the correctional facility, the department 17 shall identify and place individuals with not-for-profit providers that 18 shall continue supports and services, as needed, for up to an additional 19 year to ensure the individual's successful reintegration into the commu- 20 nity. Such services shall include, but not be limited to, connecting 21 individuals to health and behavioral health services, as appropriate, 22 assistance ensuring compliance with any parole or court mandated activ- 23 ities, connections to employment opportunities based on their skills 24 identified while incarcerated and assistance acquiring stable affordable 25 housing. The collaborating agencies shall contract with not-for-profit 26 providers to effectuate the requirements specified in this section where 27 the department is unable. 28 3. The commissioner, in consultation with appropriate community organ- 29 izations, shall submit within one year of the effective date of this 30 section, and annually thereafter, a report to the governor, the tempo- 31 rary president of the senate, the minority leader of the senate, the 32 speaker of the assembly, and the minority leader of the assembly on the 33 effectiveness of this pilot program. This pilot shall run for two years 34 and collect data on the number of people: 35 (a) connected to housing; 36 (b) housed; 37 (c) connected to employment; 38 (d) employed; 39 (e) connected to mental health care; and 40 (f) with substance abuse disorder. 41 4. No person shall have the right to demand or require participation 42 in the pilot program authorized by this section. 43 5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the depart- 44 ment to hold an incarcerated individual in confinement beyond their 45 earliest release date. 46 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 47 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law. Effective immediate- 48 ly, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation 49 necessary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 50 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.